New Jersey, session 222, S2069.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.15) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a.  There is created a dedicated, nonlapsing project fund to be held by the State Treasurer, which shall be the repository for all moneys required to be deposited therein under section 5 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.13) and any moneys appropriated or otherwise made available to the project fund. b.    All moneys deposited in the project fund shall be held and disbursed, subject to the requirements of section 11 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.19), in the form of district project grants as follows: (1)   an amount from the project fund equivalent to the total revenues received pursuant to the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) from the taxation of construction materials used for building a district project approved by the authority pursuant to a project grant agreement, or for building a district project sponsored by the authority, shall be rebated in the form of a one-time grant to the authority for disbursement to the casino licensee with an approved district project or to the authority for an authority sponsored district project; (2)   an amount from the project fund equivalent to the total revenues received pursuant to the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) from the taxation of retail sales of tangible property and services originating from and delivered from business locations in a district project approved by the authority pursuant to a project grant agreement or from business locations in a district project sponsored by the authority, shall be rebated in the form of annual grants (a) to the authority for disbursement to the casino licensee with an approved district project, or to the authority for an authority sponsored district project, with each annual grant not to exceed $2.5 million per district project and payable annually for [20] 40 years from the date of completion of the district project, or until such time as the combined total of grants disbursed under this section and under section 8 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.16) equals no more than five times the approved cost of the district project, as determined by the authority, whichever is earlier, and (b) from the amounts remaining after such disbursement in (a), to the authority for its purposes pursuant to law, as approved by the membership of the authority, with each annual grant not to exceed $2.5 million per district project and payable annually for [20] 40 years from the date of completion of the district project; (3)   the balance of the revenues in the project fund shall be deposited in the General Fund if the authority, in consultation with the State Treasurer, determines that the revenues are no longer needed for the purposes of the project fund or for the uses prescribed in P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.9 et al.)[.] ; and (4)   a district project approved pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.12), for which the district projects eligibility to receive project grants from the project fund has lapsed or expired prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be eligible to receive project grants from the project fund for an additional 20 years following the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or until such time as the combined total of grants disbursed under this section and under section 8 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.16) equals no more than five times the approved cost of the district project, as determined by the authority, whichever is earlier. c.     The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest any moneys in the project fund, or any portion thereof, in legal obligations of the United States or of the State or any political subdivision thereof.  Any income from, interest on, or increment to moneys so invested or reinvested shall be included in the project fund. (cf:  P.L.2004, c.129, s.8) 2.    Section 8 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.16) is amended to read as follows: 8.    a.  There is created a dedicated, nonlapsing room fund to be held by the State Treasurer, which shall be the repository for all moneys required to be deposited therein under section 6 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.14) and any moneys appropriated or otherwise made available to the room fund. b.    All moneys deposited in the room fund shall be held and disbursed, subject to the requirements of section 11 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.19), in the form of district projects grants as follows: (1)   an amount from the room fund equivalent to the incremental luxury tax for a district project approved by the authority pursuant to a project grant agreement or for a district project sponsored by the authority, shall be rebated in the form of annual grants from the room fund to the authority for disbursement to the casino licensee with an approved district project, or to the authority for an authority sponsored district project, and shall be payable annually for [20] 40 years from the date of completion of the district project, or until such time as the combined total of grants disbursed under this section and under section 7 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.15) equals no more than five times the approved cost of the district project, as determined by the authority, whichever is earlier; (2)   the balance of the revenues in the room fund shall be deposited in the special fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1991, c.376 (C.40:48-8.47) if the authority, in consultation with the State Treasurer, determines that the revenues are no longer needed for the purposes of the room fund or for the uses prescribed in P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.9 et al.)[.] ; and (4)   a district project approved pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.12), for which the district projects eligibility to receive project grants from the room fund has lapsed or expired prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be eligible to receive project grants from the room fund for an additional 20 years following the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or until such time as the combined total of grants disbursed under this section and under section 7 of P.L.2001, c.221 (C.5:12-173.15) equals no more than five times the approved cost of the district project, as determined by the authority, whichever is earlier. c.     The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest any moneys in the room fund, or any portion thereof, in legal obligations of the United States or of the State or any political subdivision thereof.  Any income from, interest on, or increment to moneys so invested or reinvested shall be included in the room fund. (cf:  P.L.2004, c.129, s.9) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.